Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 23. Mississippi Private Activity Bonds Allocation Act
§ 31-23-65.
Carry-forward projects; allocation.

The board may promulgate such rules and procedures as may be necessary in order to implement the provisions of the federal legislation and any regulations promulgated pursuant to the federal legislation for carry-forward projects. Bonds for carry-forward projects may be issued during the three (3) calendar years following the calendar year in which the carry-forward arose.

If there is any unused amount (other than unused amounts being carried forward pursuant to Section 31-23-63(4)) remaining in either the undesignated portion or the threshold portion at the close of business on the last business day of a year, or at such later time as may be prescribed by regulations promulgated pursuant to the federal legislation, and if issuers have previously filed with the board elections to treat specific redevelopment projects, exempt facility projects or student loan projects as carry-forward projects, and have in the election specified the carry-forward amounts and identified the purpose for which the carry-forward is elected, the board shall:

Allocate such unused amounts to such projects with respect to which issuers have filed such elections, in order of priority as follows:

First, to those redevelopment projects, exempt facility projects and student loan projects which are reasonably expected to be financed with bonds to be issued during the ensuing calendar year (proportionately in relation to the carry-forward amounts specified in the elections if the unused amounts are less than the aggregate of the carry-forward amounts specified in all such elections); and

Second, to redevelopment projects, exempt facility projects and student loan projects not described in item (i) above (proportionately in relation to the carry-forward amounts specified in the elections if the remaining unused amounts are less than the aggregate of the carry-forward amounts specified in all such elections);

Third, to priority projects not described in item (i) above (proportionately in relation to the carry-forward amounts specified in the elections if the remaining unused amounts are less than the aggregate of the carry-forward amounts specified in all such elections); and

Allocate any remainder to student loan projects, to the extent that evidence of elections with respect thereto shall be on file with the board. After unused amounts are allocated to any mortgage revenue projects, redevelopment projects, exempt facility project or student loan project, such projects shall be treated as carry-forward projects under the federal legislation.

Bonds issued to finance all or part of any project designated as a carry-forward project shall be included within the carry-forward amount for such carry-forward project if:

A statement that such bonds have been issued with a reference to the carry-forward project is delivered to the board within thirty (30) days of the issuance of such bonds; and

Either

Such bonds are issued to finance a student loan project as part of the carry-forward amount allocated pursuant to subsection (2)(b) above and bonds in aggregate principal amount equal to or greater than all amounts allocated to student loan projects pursuant to subsection (2)(a) above shall have been issued; or

Such bonds are issued in aggregate principal amount sufficient to, together with all other obligations previously issued and included within such carry-forward amount for such carry-forward project, aggregate at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the carry-forward amount with respect to such carry-forward project; or

The board shall have certified such obligations as included within such carry-forward amount; or

Such bonds are issued to finance student loan projects, in whole or in part, as all or part of a carry-forward amount allocated pursuant to Section 31-23-63(4); or

Such bonds are issued to finance student loan projects, in whole or in part, as all or part of a carry-forward amount allocated pursuant to subsection (2)(a) above.

In the event that any issuer anticipates issuing obligations to be included within the carry-forward amount for a particular project, unless such obligations will meet either the test set forth in subsection (3)(b)(i) above or the test set forth in subsection (3)(b)(ii) above, the issuer shall notify the board of its intent to issue such bonds, and advise the board of reasons for the issuance of such bonds in principal amount less than the carry-forward amount. The board shall be conclusively deemed to have certified that such obligations will be included in the carry-forward amount for such carry-forward project unless, within five (5) business days of receipt of such notice, it determines:

That the issuer and, unless such bonds are student loan bonds or mortgage revenue bonds, the borrower do not reasonably expect that bonds will be issued to finance such carry-forward project in an aggregate principal amount equal to at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the carry-forward amount specified for such carry-forward project; and

That the issuer and, unless the bonds are student loan bonds or redevelopment bonds, the borrower did not reasonably expect, on the date on which unused amounts were allocated to such carry-forward project, that bonds would be issued to finance such carry-forward project in an aggregate principal amount equal to at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the carry-forward amount specified for such carry-forward project.

In the event that unused amounts are allocated to a carry-forward project pursuant to subsection (2)(a) above, and bonds are not issued to finance all or any part of a carry-forward project within the period specified therefor, if the board determines that the issuer and, unless the bonds are student loan bonds or redevelopment bonds, the borrower did not reasonably expect, on the date on which unused amounts were so allocated to such carry-forward project, to issue bonds to finance all or part of such carry-forward project, the board may, in its discretion and for such period of time as it shall determine to be appropriate, refuse:

To accept applications for projects with respect to which the borrower designated in the election with respect to such carry-forward project (or any related person to such borrower) will be a borrower; and

To allocate carry-forward amounts to carry-forward projects with respect to which such borrower (or any related person to such borrower) will be a borrower; and

In the case of student loan bonds or redevelopment bonds, to allocate carry-forward amounts to student loan projects or redevelopment projects pursuant to subsection (2)(a) above.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).

§ 31-23-67.
Timeliness of statements accompanying applications; record of allocations; notices.

The following provisions shall apply to the system:

Any written statements or opinions of bond counsel and legal counsel and the commitment from a lender, financial institution, underwriter or investment banker accompanying any applications shall be dated no more than thirty (30) days prior to the date on which the application is filed. Such opinions, commitments and any other items accompanying an application shall be in substantially the form or forms promulgated or required by the board from time to time.

The board shall maintain a record of the notices of allocation issued and the amount of the state’s ceiling available from time to time and related data in a register thereof. Notices of allocation shall be deemed to be issued when such allocation is registered in the register. Other notices and written communications from the board shall be deemed to have been given when duly deposited in the United States mail, first class, with all postage prepaid. Notices of allocation may, at the request of the applicant, be picked up by hand at the offices of the board or be delivered by courier or other delivery service at the expense of the applicant. Notices and other written communications to, and filings with, the board shall be deemed given or made when actually received by the board, whether by actual delivery to the offices of the board or by United States mail, first class, with all postage prepaid.

Notwithstanding anything in this act to the contrary, the board may give a notice of its intention during any year to issue a notice of allocation during the next year. Such notice of intention shall be for informational purposes only, and shall not be binding upon the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).

§ 31-23-69.
Effect of changes in federal tax laws.

In the event that interest on exempt small issue bonds and/or mortgage revenue bonds is no longer excludable from federal income tax under federal law the provisions of this act with respect to exempt small issue bonds and/or mortgage revenue bonds, as applicable, thereafter shall be deemed to be of no further force and effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).